California statutes. Education Code
(g) Forming schoolsite absence intervention teams. Members of schoolsite absence intervention teams may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) A pupil personnel services (PPS) credentialholder.

(2) A
 representative from the school or school district.

(3) A representative from the school or school district who has a relationship with truant children.

(4) A representative of community-based youth service centers. 

(5) A representative of child welfare and attendance personnel. 

(6) A representative of school or county health care personnel. 

(7) A representative of school, county, or community mental health personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 154, Sec. 1.   (AB 2771)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Improvement of Pupil Attendance [48340. - 48341.]

48340.

In enacting this article it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage school districts and county offices of education maintaining any classes in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to adopt pupil attendance policies based on the active involvement of parents, pupils, teachers, administrators, other personnel, and community members which include proposals and procedures for the following:

(a) Notifying parents of pupil absences, including notification of parents on the day of each absence.

(b) Increasing parent and pupil awareness of the importance of regular pupil attendance.

(c) Auditing and accountability of pupil attendance.

(d) Staff development for certificated and classified personnel.

(e) Alternative learning programs designed to respond to the different ways pupils learn, such as independent study.

(f) Joint efforts between law enforcement and schools, such as school level attendance review teams and periodic efforts to return truant pupils to school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1329, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

48341.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare and disseminate to school districts and county superintendents of schools information regarding effective practices to improve pupil attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1329, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Local Educational Agency Instruction Collaboration Agreements [48345. - 48349.]

48345.

(a) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board or body of a local educational agency may enter into an agreement with one or more local educational agencies to offer the same or similar corresponding individual courses and coursework to a pupil from another local educational agency subject to the agreement who has been impacted by any of the following:

(1) Disruptions or cancellations in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) classes.

(2) Disruptions or cancellations in dual language immersion
 programs.

(3) Teacher shortages in STEM classes or dual language immersion programs.

(c) If the governing board or body of a local educational agency elects to accept pupils pursuant to subdivision (b), it shall determine the number of pupils it is willing to offer the same or similar corresponding individual courses or coursework to under this section and shall accept pupils who apply for the same or similar corresponding individual courses or coursework until the local educational agency is at maximum capacity.

(d) The local educational agency accepting pupils pursuant to subdivision (b) shall ensure that the pupils admitted are selected through an unbiased process that prohibits an inquiry into, or evaluation
 or consideration of, whether or not a pupil should be authorized to participate in the course or coursework based upon the pupil’s academic or athletic performance, proficiency in English, physical condition, any of the individual characteristics set forth in Section 200, or family income.

(e) If the number of pupils seeking a classroom opportunity pursuant to subdivision (b) exceeds the number of seats available in a classroom of the local educational agency offering to serve pupils from another local educational agency, the approval for study shall be determined by a random drawing held in public at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing
 board or body of the local educational agency offering to serve pupils from another local educational agency.

(f) Local educational agencies that enter into a collaborative agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) shall publicly post information to ensure that pupils and their families are aware of the opportunities to participate under the agreement. This publicly available information shall include, at a minimum, any applicable forms and the timelines for submissions pursuant to the agreement.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the average daily attendance attributable to a pupil authorized to participate in the course or coursework by a local educational agency pursuant to this section shall remain with the local educational agency that the pupil originated from for purposes of
 state apportionment. The agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include an appropriate shared cost structure negotiated by the collaborating local educational agencies.

(h) On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall evaluate the programs implemented pursuant to this section, including an analysis of whether pupils benefited from the programs and any obstacles to creating the programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 48349.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 48349.)
-------------------------------------------

48349.

This article shall become inoperative on July 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 9.5, commencing with Section 48345.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Open Enrollment Act [48350. - 48361.]

48350.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Open Enrollment Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48351.

The purpose of this article is to improve pupil achievement, in accordance with the regulations and guidelines for the federal Race to the Top Fund, authorized under the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), and to enhance parental choice in education by providing additional options to pupils to enroll in public schools throughout the state without regard to the residence of their parents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48352.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Low-achieving school” means any school identified by the Superintendent pursuant to the following:

(1) Excluding the schools, and taking into account the impact of the criteria in paragraph (2), the Superintendent annually shall create a list of 1,000 schools ranked by increasing API with the same ratio of elementary, middle, and high schools as existed in decile 1 in the 2008–09 school year.

(2) In constructing the list of 1,000 schools each year, the Superintendent shall ensure each of the following:

(A) A local educational agency shall not have more than 10 percent of its schools on the list. However, if the number of schools in a local educational agency is not evenly divisible by 10, the Superintendent shall round up to the next whole number of schools.

(B) Court, community, or community day schools shall not be included on the list.

(C) Charter schools shall not be included on the list. 

(b) “Parent” means the natural or adoptive parent or guardian of a dependent child.

(c) “School district of enrollment” means a school district other than the school district in which the parent of a pupil resides, but in which the
 parent of the pupil nevertheless intends to enroll the pupil pursuant to this article.

(d) “School district of residence” means a school district in which the parent of a pupil resides and in which the pupil would otherwise be required to enroll pursuant to Section 48200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48353.

The state board shall adopt emergency regulations to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48354.

(a) The parent of a pupil enrolled in a low-achieving school may submit an application for the pupil to attend a school in a school district of enrollment pursuant to this article.

(b) (1) Consistent with the requirements of Section 1116(b)(1)(E) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), on or before the first day of the school year, or, if later, on the date the notice of program improvement, corrective action, or restructuring status is required to be provided under federal law the district of residence shall provide the parents and guardians of all pupils enrolled in a school determined in subdivision (a) of Section 48352 with
 notice of the option to transfer to another public school served by the school district of residence or another school district.

(2) An application requesting a transfer pursuant to this article shall be submitted by the parent of a pupil to the school district of enrollment prior to January 1 of the school year preceding the school year for which the pupil is requesting to transfer. The school district of enrollment may waive the deadline specified in this paragraph.

(3) The application deadline specified in paragraph (2) does not apply to an application requesting a transfer if the parent, with whom the pupil resides, is enlisted in the military and was relocated by the military within 90 days prior to submitting the application.

(4) The application may request enrollment of the pupil in a specific school or
 program within the school district of enrollment.

(5) A pupil may enroll in a school in the school district of enrollment in the school year immediately following the approval of his or her application.

(6) In order to provide priority enrollment opportunities for pupils residing in the school district, a school district of enrollment shall establish a period of time for resident pupil enrollment prior to accepting transfer applications pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48355.

(a) The school district of residence of a pupil or a school district of enrollment to which a pupil has applied to attend may prohibit the transfer of the pupil pursuant to this article or limit the number of pupils who transfer pursuant to this article if the governing board of the district determines that the transfer would negatively impact either of the following:

(1) A court-ordered or voluntary desegregation plan of the district.

(2) The racial and ethnic balance of the district, provided that any policy adopted pursuant to this paragraph is consistent with federal and state law.

(b) A school district of residence shall not adopt any other policies that in any way prevent or discourage pupils from applying for a transfer to a school district of enrollment.

(c) Communications to parents or guardians by districts regarding the open enrollment options provided by this article shall be factually accurate and not target individual parents or guardians or residential neighborhoods on the basis of a child’s actual or perceived academic or athletic performance or any other personal characteristic.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48356.

(a) A school district of enrollment may adopt specific, written standards for acceptance and rejection of applications pursuant to this article. The standards may include consideration of the capacity of a program, class, grade level, school building, or adverse financial impact. Subject to subdivision (b), and except as necessary in accordance with Section 48355, the standards shall not include consideration of a pupil’s previous academic achievement, physical condition, proficiency in the English language, family income, or any of the individual characteristics set forth in Section 200.

(b) In considering an application pursuant to this article, a nonresident school district may apply its usual
 requirements for admission to a magnet school or a program designed to serve gifted and talented pupils.

(c) Subject to the rules and standards that apply to pupils who reside in the school district of enrollment, a resident pupil who is enrolled in one of the district’s schools pursuant to this article shall not be required to submit an application in order to remain enrolled.

(d) A school district of enrollment shall ensure that pupils enrolled pursuant to standards adopted pursuant to this section are enrolled in a school with a higher Academic Performance Index than the school in which the pupil was previously enrolled and are selected through a random, unbiased process that prohibits an evaluation of whether or not the pupil should be enrolled based on his or her individual academic or athletic performance, or any of the other characteristics set forth in subdivision (a),
 except that pupils applying for a transfer pursuant to this article shall be assigned priority for approval as follows:

(1) First priority for the siblings of children who already attend the desired school.

(2) Second priority for pupils transferring from a program improvement school ranked in decile 1 on the Academic Performance Index determined pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 48352.

(3) If the number of pupils who request a particular school exceeds the number of spaces available at that school, a lottery shall be conducted in the group priority order identified in paragraphs (1) and (2) to select pupils at random until all of the available spaces are filled.

(e) The initial application of a pupil for transfer to a school within a school
 district of enrollment shall not be approved if the transfer would require the displacement from the desired school of any other pupil who resides within the attendance area of that school or is currently enrolled in that school.

(f) A pupil approved for a transfer to a school district of enrollment pursuant to this article shall be deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of Section 48204.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48357.

Within 60 days of receiving an application pursuant to Section 48354, a school district of enrollment shall notify the applicant parent and the school district of residence in writing whether the application has been accepted or rejected. If an application is rejected, the school district of enrollment shall state in the notification the reasons for the rejection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48358.

A school district of enrollment that enrolls a pupil pursuant to this article shall accept credits toward graduation that were awarded to the pupil by another school district and shall graduate the pupil if the pupil meets the graduation requirements of the school district of enrollment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48359.

(a) Each school district is encouraged to keep an accounting of all requests made for alternative attendance pursuant to this article and records of all disposition of those requests that may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of requests granted, denied, or withdrawn. In the case of denied requests, the records may indicate the reasons for the denials.

(2) The number of pupils who transfer out of the district.

(3) The number of pupils who transfer into the district.

(4) The
 race, ethnicity, gender, self-reported socioeconomic status, and the school district of residence of each of the pupils described in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(5) The number of pupils described in paragraphs (2) and (3) who are classified as English learners or identified as individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026.

(b) The information maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) may be reported to the governing board of the school district at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48359.5.

(a) For a school district of enrollment that is a basic aid school district, the apportionment of state funds for average daily attendance credited pursuant to this article shall be 70 percent of the school district local control funding formula base grant that would have been apportioned to the school district of residence pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02. Apportionment of these funds shall begin in the second consecutive year of enrollment, and continue annually until the pupil graduates from, or is no longer enrolled in, the school district of enrollment.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), until the Superintendent determines that the school district of residence is funded pursuant to Section 42238.02, the Superintendent shall apportion, for average daily attendance pursuant to this article, the lesser of the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) or 70 percent of the sum of the entitlements for the school district of residence for the specified fiscal year as computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), of Section 42238.03, divided by the average daily attendance pursuant to this article for that fiscal year and then multiplied by the ratio of local control funding formula base grant funding computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 to the local control funding formula amount for the fiscal year computed pursuant to Section 42238.02.

(c) If the entitlements for the school district of residence computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and paragraph
 (3) of subdivision (b), of Section 42238.03, include funding calculated pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 for a fiscal year, subdivision (b) shall not apply and the apportionment of state funds for the average daily attendance credited pursuant to this section for that fiscal year shall be calculated pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) For purposes of this section, “basic aid school district” means a school district that does not receive an apportionment of state funds as described in subdivision (o) of Section 42238.02 for a fiscal year in which this section may apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 48.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

48360.

(a) From federal funds appropriated for this purpose, the Superintendent shall contract for an independent evaluation of the open enrollment program operated pursuant to this article. The evaluation shall, at a minimum, consider all of the following:

(1) The levels of, and changes in, academic achievement of pupils in school districts of residence and school districts of enrollment for pupils who do and do not elect to enroll in a school district of enrollment.

(2) Fiscal and programmatic effects on school districts of residence and school districts of enrollment.

(3) Numbers and demographic and socioeconomic characteristics of pupils who do and do not elect to enroll in a school district of enrollment.

(b) The Superintendent shall provide a final evaluation report to the Legislature, Governor, and state board on or before October 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48361.

No exercise of discretion by a district of enrollment in its administration of this article shall be overturned absent a finding as designated by a court of competent jurisdiction that the district governing board acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   (SB 4 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Compulsory Continuation Education [48400. - 48454.]



  ARTICLE 1. Pupils Subject To [48400. - 48403.]

48400.

All persons 16 years of age or older and under 18 years of age, not otherwise exempted by this chapter, shall attend upon special continuation education classes maintained by the governing board of the high school district in which they reside, or by the governing board of a neighboring high school district, for not less than four 60-minute hours per week for the regularly established annual school term. Such minimum attendance requirement of four 60-minute hours per week may be satisfied by any combination of attendance upon special continuation education classes and regional occupational centers or programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48401.

The complaint of any citizen of a school district that such school district has failed to meet the requirements of providing continuation education classes pursuant to this chapter shall be presented to the county superintendent of the county in which such district is located. If, upon investigation, the county superintendent of schools finds the complaint to be justified, he shall forward the complaint along with the results of his investigation to the Superintendent of Public Instruction who shall take steps to enforce compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48402.

Whenever a minor subject to the provisions of this chapter, who is not otherwise exempted by this chapter, cannot give satisfactory proof of regular employment he shall attend, for not less than 15 hours per week, special continuation education classes during the period of unemployment. The minimum attendance requirement of 15 hours per week may be satisfied by any combination of attendance upon special continuation education classes and regional occupational centers or programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48403.

If any person subject to the provisions of this chapter is an habitual truant or is irregular in attendance as required by this chapter or is habitually insubordinate or disorderly during attendance at school, the county superintendent of schools may request a petition on his behalf in the juvenile court of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Pupils Exempt [48410. - 48416.]

48410.

There are exempted from compulsory attendance in continuing education classes as otherwise required by Sections 48400 and 48402, persons who:

(a) Have been graduated from a high school maintaining a four-year course above the eighth grade of the elementary schools, or who have had an equal amount of education in a private school or from a private tutor.

(b) Are in attendance upon a public or private full-time day school, or satisfactory part-time classes maintained by other agencies.

(c) Are disqualified for attendance in these classes because of their physical or mental condition, or because of personal services that must be rendered to their dependents.

(d) Are satisfactorily attending a regional occupational program or center as provided in Section 48432.

(e) Have successfully demonstrated proficiency equal to or greater than standards established by the State Department of Education pursuant to Section 48412, and have verified approval submitted by their parent or guardian.

(f) Are subject to Section 48400 but not Section 48402 and are in attendance upon classes for adults for not less than four clock hours per calendar week.

(g) Are exempt from compulsory school attendance under Section 48231.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 10.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

48412.

(a) (1) A person 16 years of age or older, or who has been enrolled in grade 10 for one school year or longer, or who will complete one school year of enrollment in grade 10 at the end of the semester during which the next regular examination will be conducted, may have their proficiency in basic skills taught in public high schools verified according to criteria established by the department.

(2) The state board shall award a “certificate of proficiency” to persons who demonstrate that proficiency. The certificate of proficiency shall be equivalent to a high school diploma, and the department shall keep a permanent record of the issuance of all certificates.

(b) (1) (A) The department shall develop standards of competency in basic skills taught in public high schools and shall provide for the administration of examinations prepared by or with the approval of the department to verify competency. Regular examinations shall be held at least once in the fall semester and at least once in the spring semester of every school year on dates, as determined by the department, that will enable notification of examinees and the schools they attend, if any, of the results of the examinations not later than two weeks before the date on which that semester ends in a majority of school districts that maintain high schools.

(B) For the 2020–21 school year, regular examinations shall be offered only if they can be administered in accordance with state and local public health orders, as determined by the Superintendent.

(2) In addition to regular examinations, the department may, at the discretion of the Superintendent, conduct examinations for all eligible persons at least once during each summer recess and may conduct examinations at any other time that the Superintendent deems necessary to accommodate eligible persons whose religious convictions or physical handicaps prevent their attending one of the regular examinations.

(c) (1) The department may charge a fee for each examination application in an amount sufficient to recover the costs of administering the requirements of this section. However, the fee shall not exceed an amount equal to the cost of test renewal and administration per examination application. Pursuant to Section 16370 of the Government Code, there is hereby authorized in the State Treasury a Special Deposit Fund Account, which shall consist of fees that may be prescribed by this section. All of the fees
 collected are hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the support of the department to be used pursuant to this section.

(2) The department shall not charge the fee to an examinee who meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The examinee qualifies as a homeless child or youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), or as a foster youth, as defined in subdivision (h).

(B) The examinee has not attained 25 years of age as of the date of the scheduled examination.

(C) For an examinee who qualifies as a homeless child or youth pursuant to subparagraph (A), the examinee can verify the examinee’s status as a homeless child or youth. A homeless services
 provider that has knowledge of the examinee’s housing status may verify the examinee’s status for purposes of this subparagraph.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a “homeless services provider” includes either of the following:

(A) A homeless services provider listed in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Any other person or entity that is qualified to verify an individual’s housing status, as determined by the department.

(4) The loss of fees pursuant to paragraph (2), if any, shall be deemed to be a cost of administering this section for purposes of paragraph (1).

(d) (1) The state board shall adopt rules and
 regulations as necessary for implementation of this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the state board shall adopt emergency regulations, as necessary, to implement the provisions of subdivision (c), as amended by Chapter 384 of the Statutes of 2015. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare.

(e) The department shall periodically review the effectiveness of the examinations administered pursuant to this section. The costs of this review may be recovered through the fees levied pursuant to subdivision (c).

(f) (1) On or before December 1, 2018, the Superintendent shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature that
 includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number of homeless youth and foster youth that took a high school proficiency test in each of the 2016, 2017, and 2018 calendar years.

(B) The impact of the opportunity to take a high school proficiency test at no cost on the number and percentage of homeless youth and foster youth taking a high school proficiency test.

(C) The estimated number of homeless youth and foster youth who may take a high school proficiency test in future years.

(D) Recommendations for a permanent funding source to cover the cost of the waived fees.

(E) The annual and projected administrative cost to the department.

(F) The annual and projected reimbursement to contractors pursuant to this section.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(g) Additional state funds shall not be appropriated for purposes of implementing paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(h) For purposes of this section, a “foster youth” means any individual who meets or has ever met one of the following criteria:

(1) A child who was the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and removed from the child’s home by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 319 or 361 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) A child who was the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and removed from the child’s home by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 727 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 51.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

48413.

Persons 16 years of age or older and under 18 years of age who have not been graduated from high school shall be permitted by the governing board to enroll in continuation classes conducted by the school district pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 48430) of this chapter if such enrollment does not preclude attainment of the goals of continuation education schools and classes prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 48430) of this chapter, as determined by the governing board. The provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 48260) of Chapter 2 of this part shall be applicable to such persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48414.

Any person 16 or 17 years of age exempt from compulsory continuation attendance laws by subdivision (e) of Section 48410 who has terminated his enrollment on the basis of such exemption shall be permitted by the governing board of the school district in which he resides to reenroll in the district, without prejudice, as if he had never taken advantage of subdivision (e) of Section 48410. If such person subsequently again terminates enrollment on the basis of such exemption, the district may deny him reenrollment until the beginning of the next semester in the district’s academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

48415.

In the case of attendance upon private school, exemption from the requirements of attendance upon compulsory continuation education shall be valid only after verification by the attendance supervisor of the district, or other person designated by the board of education, that the private school has complied with the provisions of Section 33190 requiring the annual filing by the owner or other head of a private school of an affidavit or statement of prescribed information with the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The verification required by this section shall not be construed as an evaluation, recognition, approval, or endorsement of any private school or course.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48416.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a child who, at the time a leave of absence is to begin, will be between the ages of 16 and 18, inclusive, may take a leave of absence from compulsory continuation education classes or, if exempted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48410, from the school that the child attends, for a period of up to two semesters, if all the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The school district governing board adopts a written policy to allow student leaves of absence consistent with this section.

(b) The purpose of the leave is supervised travel, study, training, or work not available to the student under another education option.

(c) A written agreement is entered into that is signed by the child, the child’s parent or guardian, the principal or administrative officer of the school that the child would otherwise attend, a classroom teacher familiar with the child’s academic progress selected by the child, and the district supervisor of child welfare and attendance, and that provides for all of the following:

(1) The purpose of the leave.

(2) The length of time the child will be on leave.

(3) A meeting between or contact with the child and a school official designated in the agreement at least once a month while the child is on leave.

(4) A statement incorporating the provisions contained in subdivision (b).

(d) The child shall be entitled to return to school at any time. No child who takes a leave of absence shall be penalized from completing his or her academic requirements within a time period equal to that of classmates who did not take a leave of absence, plus a period of time equal to the leave of absence. However, when a child reenrolls at any time other than the beginning of a semester, the school shall not be required to give makeup sessions during that semester for the classes that the child has missed.

(e) A leave of absence may be extended for an additional semester upon approval by all parties to the written agreement and the local school attendance review board.

(f) No leave of absence may be taken that would continue past the end of the school year in which the leave is taken.

(g) If the student does not contact the designated school official as stipulated in the written agreement, the leave of absence shall be nullified.

Any party to the written agreement may nullify the written agreement for cause at any time.

(h) No more than 1 percent of the students enrolled and in attendance at each school shall be permitted to take a leave of absence during each academic year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Continuation Classes [48430. - 48438.]

48430.

It is the intent of the Legislature that continuation education schools and classes shall be established and maintained to provide all of the following:

(1) An opportunity for pupils to complete the required academic courses of instruction to graduate from high school.

(2) A program of instruction which emphasizes occupational orientation or a work-study schedule and offers intensive guidance services to meet the special needs of pupils.

(3) A program designed to meet the educational needs of each pupil, including, but not limited to, independent study, regional occupation programs, work study, career counseling, and job placement services, as a supplement to classroom instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 83.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

48431.

The governing board of each high school district shall establish and maintain a program of guidance, placement, and followup for all minors within the district subject to compulsory continuation education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48432.

The governing board of each high school district and each unified school district shall establish and maintain within its boundaries special continuation education classes and may establish and maintain regional occupational centers or programs, in accordance with the provisions of Section 52301, whenever there are any minors residing within the district who are subject to compulsory continuation education; provided, that if there are fewer than 100 students enrolled in grade 12 in any school of the district maintaining that grade, the governing board of the district may apply to the State Department of Education for exemption of that school from the requirements of this section and such exemption may be granted in accordance with rules and regulations that shall be adopted by the State Board of Education to govern the granting of the exemptions. An exemption may also be granted to schools having an enrollment of more than 100 pupils in grade 12 if the district seeking the exemption has entered into an agreement with another high school district or unified school district to maintain special continuation education classes for minors residing in either of the districts, but shall not be granted if the agreement would make it necessary for such minors to travel an excessive distance from their homes to the continuation education classes.

If there is a regional occupational center or program as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 52300) of Chapter 9 of Part 28, of this division within a county, the governing board of any school district within that county may enroll minors, otherwise subject to, and in lieu of, continuation education, in the center or program in accordance with the provisions of Section 52314.

Any minor admitted to a regional occupational center or program under the provisions of Section 52314.5 shall be considered to have enrolled in the regional occupational center or program in lieu of continuation education classes. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a minor from enrolling in a program of continuation education or a regular high school program if the minor voluntarily chooses to enroll in the program.
